Utah statutes.
73-11-4.   School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration to vote stock of consolidated district.

In the event it is necessary for the consolidated corporation to borrow money for consolidation expenses, repairs, improvements, and operation, and to pay the indebtedness of the Price River water conservation district or any of the constituent companies, and to pledge or mortgage all or any part of the assets and properties of the consolidated corporation as security therefor, the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration is authorized to vote the stock of the state in favor of the action, providing it considers the action to be in the best interest of all the constituent parties.

